District of Columbia statutes.
42-3232

Fraudulent attornment void; possession not changed by such attornment; limitation on scope of provisions.

All and every fraudulent attornment and attornments of any tenant or tenants of any messuages, lands, tenements, or hereditaments, shall be absolutely null and void to all intents and purposes whatsoever; and the possession of their respective landlord or landlords, lessor or lessors, shall not be deemed or construed to be anywise changed, altered, or affected by any such attornment or attornments; provided always, that nothing herein contained shall extend to vacate or affect any attornment made pursuant to and in consequence of some judgment at law, or decree or order of a court of equity, or made with the privity and consent of the landlord or landlords, lessor or lessors, or to any mortgagee after the mortgage is become forfeited.

11 Geo. 2, ch. 19, § 11, 1738
Kilty’s Rep. 251
Alex. Br. Stat. 737
Comp. Stat. D.C., 332, § 60
1981 Ed., § 45-1432.
1973 Ed., § 45-934.